Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB684.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1501-N of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1501-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Parent." An individual who has legal custody or guardianship of a student.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1503-N. School entity duties related to evidence-based reading instruction.A school entity shall do all of the following beginning with the 2026-2027 school year:(1) Adopt an evidence-based reading instruction curriculum.(2) Approve a professional development training program from a list developed by the council, that satisfies the requirements under section 1205.8(c) for educators providing reading instruction.(3) Identify an educator responsible for assisting each school with the implementation of the curriculum adopted under paragraph (1).(4) Demonstrate that each educator responsible for providing reading instruction or coaching is in the process of completing approved professional development under paragraph (2). An educator must complete approved professional development training under paragraph (2) no later than the beginning of the 2028-2029 school year.Section 1504-N. School entity duties related to reading screening.(a) General rule.--A school entity shall do all of the following beginning with the 2026-2027 school year:(1) Screen each student enrolled in kindergarten through third grade for reading competency three times each school year, once at the beginning of the school year, once during 20250HB0684PN1557 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the middle of the year and once at the end of the school year. In conducting the screening, the school entity shall use a universal reading screener chosen from the list of approved universal reading screeners under section 1502-N(b).(2) Provide educators time during the contractual school day to complete data entry and compilation associated with the screener, to communicate with families and carry out any other responsibility required under this section.(b) Exception.--Students with limited English proficiency, students with disabilities and gifted students are subject to the requirements of this section, unless the assessment would conflict with the educational program, plan or service agreement provided in accordance with Federal or State law and regulation.Section 1505-N. Reading deficiency identification and parental notification.(a) Student.--A student in kindergarten through grade three shall be identified as having a reading deficiency if an approved universal reading screener administered under section 1504-N identifies the student at risk for reading failure.(b) Reading deficiency.--A student who is identified as having a reading deficiency under subsection (a) shall remain identified as having a reading deficiency until the student performs at or above an identified threshold level using at least three data points, which may include:(1) results on a universal reading screener;(2) the educator's professional judgment on a student's performance;(3) progress monitoring outcomes;(4) diagnostic assessments;(5) benchmark assessments; and20250HB0684PN1557 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) formative or summative assessments.(c) Parental notification.--A school entity shall notify, in writing or electronically:(1) Each parent of a kindergarten student who exhibits a deficiency in reading in the third screening at the end of the school year.(2) Each parent of a first through third grade student who exhibits a deficiency in reading during the school year after the identification of the reading deficiency, including periodic updates three times per year regarding the student's progress.(d) Construction.--Nothing under this section shall be construed to prohibit a school entity from identifying a student in another grade level as being in need of reading interventions.Section 1506-N. Reading intervention plans. (a) Duty of school entity.--A school entity shall offer a reading intervention plan to each student in kindergarten through grade three who is identified as having a reading deficiency under section 1505-N with the goal of ensuring that the student can read at or above grade level by the end of grade three.(b) Development.--The reading intervention plan shall be developed by an educator.(c) Contents.--The reading intervention plan shall, at a minimum, include reading intervention approaches and be provided in addition to:(1) instruction provided to each student in the general education classroom; and(2) evidence-based instruction curriculum.20250HB0684PN1557 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1507-N. Grant program. (a) Establishment.--The department shall establish a grant program to aid school entities with costs associated with training and other resources necessary to implement this article. The total amount of grants awarded shall be limited to funds appropriated for this purpose under section 1508-N.(b) Application.--The department shall develop an application form that school entities must use to apply for a grant under the program. Grant applications must be submitted in accordance with guidelines developed by the department.Section 1508-N. Funding. The department shall use the following funding sources to award grants to school entities and administer the program, including providing professional coaching and contracting with multiple service providers to provide coaching support in the program as required under section 1205.8:(1) Appropriations to the department for the purpose of this article.(2) Appropriations to the department for general government operations.(3) Money made available to the department from other public and private sources, including the Federal Government.Section 1509-N. Reporting. (a) School entity report.--Beginning September 30, 2027, and continuing each September 30 thereafter, a school entity shall report annually to the department the following:(1) The number and percentage of students, disaggregated by grade and by individual school, identified with a potential reading deficiency at the beginning of the school year according to the first screening of the school year 20250HB0684PN1557 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required under section 1504-N and the literacy intervention approaches provided.(2) The number and percentage of students, disaggregated by grade and by individual school, identified with a potential reading deficiency at the end of the school year according to the final screening of the school year required under section 1504-N.(3) The number of students, disaggregated by grade and by individual school, excepted from the assessment under section 1504-N(b).(4) The evidence-based reading instruction curricula adopted under this article by the school entity.(5) The number of educators in the school entity who have received professional development under section 1502-N(b)(3) and the type of professional development received.(b) Department report.--Beginning November 30, 2027, and continuing each November 30 thereafter, the department shall produce an annual report that provides the information reported to the department under subsection (a).(c) Report data.--Data included in the report shall be deidentified and comply with 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights).(d) Public posting.--The department shall post the report required under this section on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, and shall submit the report to each of the following:(1) The Governor. (2) The State Board of Education. (3) The President pro tempore of the Senate. (4) The Speaker of the House of Representatives. 20250HB0684PN1557 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 1510-N. Accountability. (a) Duties of the department.--The department shall monitor and enforce school entity compliance with this article as follows:(1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, and continuing each school year thereafter, the department shall develop a plan to monitor progress of a school entity's structured literacy program to ensure improved educational outcomes.(2) If a school entity is not in compliance with this article or its students are not demonstrating progress in reading skills or proficiency, the department shall implement appropriate and evidence-based corrective actions, including literacy coaches and other resources.(b) Effect of noncompliance.--A school entity that declines department assistance under subsection (a) forfeits grant funding under this article.Section 1511-N. Construction. Nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and procedures afforded to school employees or labor organizations under Federal or State law or any provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between a school employer and an exclusive representative of the employees in accordance with the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0684PN1557 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930